Louisiana, session 2026, HB1119.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1124, 1201.1(K)(8)(a) and (c), and 1226(B)(3)(c) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1124. Refusal to submit to an additional medical opinion regarding an examination;
effect on right to compensation
If the employee refuses to submit himself to an additional medical opinion
regarding a medical examination at the behest of the employer or an examination
conducted pursuant to R.S. 23:1123, or in anywise any way obstructs the same
examination, his right to compensation and to take or prosecute any further
proceedings under pursuant to this Chapter may be suspended by the employer or
payor until the examination takes place. Such suspension of benefits by the
employer or payor shall be made in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
23:1201.1(A)(4) and (5) occur only after an expedited hearing has been conducted
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2598 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1119
as provided for in this Section. Any employer or payor who seeks to compel an
employee's compliance with a medical examination shall be granted an expedited
hearing. The hearing shall be held no less than ten and no more than thirty days after
the employee, or his attorney, receives notice, delivered by certified or registered
mail, of the motion seeking to compel the examination. No pre-trial conference
mediation shall be required in connection with the hearing. The hearing shall be
conducted as a rule to show cause. Unless the employee can show good cause for
his refusal or obstruction of the medical examination, the court shall order the
employee's compensation and prosecution rights suspended until the examination
takes place. Once the examination takes place, all suspended benefits shall be paid
to the employee within ten days of the examination. When the employee has filed a
disputed claim, the employer or payor may move for an order to compel the
employee to appear for an additional medical opinion regarding an examination. The
employee shall receive at least fourteen days written notice prior to the additional
medical opinion regarding an examination. When a right to compensation is
suspended no compensation shall be payable in respect to the period of suspension.
* * *
§1201.1. Controversion of compensation and medical benefits
* * *
K.
* * *
(8)(a) Upon motion of either party, whether or not the employer or payor is
entitled to a preliminary determination, the workers' compensation judge's ruling in
a hearing shall be conducted as an expedited summary proceeding and shall be
considered an order of the court and not requiring require a further trial on the
merits, if it concerns any of the following matters:
(i) The employee has sought choice of physician pursuant to R.S.
23:1121(B)(1), including any dispute relative to penalties and attorney fees for
alleged failure to authorize the employee's choice of physician.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2598 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1119
(ii) The employee has filed a claim pursuant to R.S. 23:1226(B)(3)(a).
(iii) The employer or payor seeks to compel the employee to sign the choice
of physician form pursuant to R.S. 23:1121(B)(5).
(iv) The employer or payor seeks to compel the employee's submission to
a medical examination pursuant to R.S. 23:1124.
(v) The employer seeks to require the employee to return form LWC-1025
or LWC-1020.
(vi) The employee seeks to have a suspension of benefits for failure to
comply with R.S. 23:1121(B)(1) lifted.
(vii) The employee seeks to have a suspension of benefits for failure to
submit to a medical examination lifted.
(viii) The employee seeks to have a suspension of benefits for failure to
comply with R.S. 23:1208(H) lifted.
(ix)(viii) The employee employer seeks to have a reduction in benefits for
failure to cooperate with vocational rehabilitation lifted.
* * *
(c) The workers' compensation judge shall order the employee to sign the
choice of physician form, enforce the employee's submission to the medical
examination, or provide the LWC-1020 or LWC-1025 form as applicable, unless the
employee can show good cause for his refusal.
* * *
§1226. Rehabilitation of injured employees
* * *
B.
* * *
(3)
* * *
(c) Upon refusal by the employee to cooperate with vocational rehabilitation,
the employer or payor may file a motion in accordance with R.S.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2598 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1119
23:1201.1(K)(8)(a)(viii) to reduce weekly compensation, including supplemental
earnings benefits pursuant to R.S. 23:1221(3), by fifty percent for each week of the
period of refusal. Reduction of benefits by the employer or payor shall be made in
accordance with the provisions of R.S. 23:1201.1(A) through (E) ordered by the
court upon a finding that the employee has unreasonably refused to cooperate with
vocational rehabilitation.
* * *